Virginia statutes. Title 56. Public Service Companies.
Chapter 18.
Washington Metropolitan Area Transit Regulation Compact.

§§ 56-529, 56-530.

Not set out. (1958, c. 627; 1962, c. 67; 1964, c. 626; 1966, c. 2; 1969, Ex. Sess., c. 21; 1970, c. 590; 1972, c. 571; 1973, c. 248; 1977, c. 592; 1981, c. 378; 1984, c. 610; 1987, c. 112; 1988, c. 890; 1995, c. 150; 2007, c. 378; 2009, cc. 540, 771, 828.)

Cross references.

- For Transportation District Act of 1964, see

§

15.2-4500

et seq.

Editor's note.

- This chapter, relating to the Washington Metropolitan Area Transit Regulation Compact, was derived from Acts 1958, c. 627, as amended by Acts 1962, c. 67; Acts 1964, c. 626; Acts 1966, c. 2; Acts 1969, Ex. Sess., c. 21; Acts 1970, c. 590; Acts 1972, c. 571; Acts 1973, c. 248; Acts 1977, c. 592; Acts 1981, c. 378; Acts 1984, c. 610; Acts 1987, c. 112; Acts 1988, c. 890; Acts 1995, c. 150, and Acts 2007, c. 378. In furtherance of the general policy of the Commission to include in the Code only provisions having general and permanent application, these statutes, which are limited in their purpose and scope, are not set out here, but attention is called to them by this reference.

For legislation by Maryland, see Annotated Code of Maryland, Transportation,

§§

10-204, 10-205. For legislation by Congress, see P.L. 86-794 (74 Stat. 1031); P.L. 87-767 (76 Stat. 764); P.L. 89-774 (80 Stat. 1324); P.L. 92-349 (86 Stat. 464).